tests/runtime/not.sbl
// Test `not`.

externals (stem)

define stem as (
  ='stopknot'

  test (
    $(cursor == 0) or fail='cursor not 0 before test'
    next or fail='next failed'
    do (
       not ([next] delete 'o')
    )
    $(cursor == 1) or fail='do failed to restore cursor'
  )

  backwards (
    $(cursor == 7) or fail='cursor not 7 before test'
    next or fail='next failed'
    do (
       not ([next] delete 'n')
    )
    $(cursor == 5) or fail='backwards do failed to restore cursor'
  )

  not (next fail='this should never be seen')
  $(cursor == 0) or fail='`not` failed to restore cursor'
  ='ok'
  not true and fail='`not true` raised signal t'
)
